Associations between cognitive, functional, and FDG-PET measures of decline in AD and MCI.The Functional Activities Questionnaire (FAQ) and Alzheimer's Disease Assessment Scale-cognitive subscale (ADAS-cog) are frequently used indices of cognitive decline in Alzheimer's disease (AD). The goal of this study was to compare FDG-PET and clinical measurements in a large sample of elderly subjects with memory disturbance. We examined relationships between glucose metabolism in FDG-PET regions of interest (FDG-ROIs), and ADAS-cog and FAQ scores in AD and mild cognitive impairment (MCI) patients enrolled in the Alzheimer's Disease Neuroimaging Initiative (ADNI). Low glucose metabolism at baseline predicted subsequent ADAS-cog and FAQ decline. In addition, longitudinal glucose metabolism decline was associated with concurrent ADAS-cog and FAQ decline. Finally, a power analysis revealed that FDG-ROI values have greater statistical power than ADAS-cog to detect attenuation of cognitive decline in AD and MCI patients. Glucose metabolism is a sensitive measure of change in cognition and functional ability in AD and MCI, and has value in predicting future cognitive decline.Predictors of cognitive change in middle-aged and older adults with memory loss.Previous longitudinal studies of age-related memory loss have focused on objective neuropsychological measures that predict subsequent cognitive change, yet brain metabolic function, self-perception of memory loss, and other measures may also be sensitive indicators of cognitive change. To determine such baseline predictors of change, the authors made longitudinal assessments of middle-aged and older adults with memory loss.Forty-two persons (mean age = 60 years, range = 43-81) with memory complaints received comprehensive baseline assessments, including subjective neuropsychological measures, objective measures of visual-spatial memory (the Benton Visual Retention Test) and verbal memory (the Buschke-Fuld Selective Reminding Test), and positron emission tomography scans to determine neocortical glucose metabolism. At an average follow-up of 3 years, the objective neuropsychological measures were again used to quantify the degree of cognitive change.Multiple regression analyses indicated that parietal asymmetry, sex of the subject, and baseline visual-spatial memory score were significant predictors of change in visual-spatial memory; level of education and baseline verbal memory score predicted change in verbal memory. Other neocortical asymmetry scores, age, family history of Alzheimer's disease, cerebral atrophy, and self-ratings of use of mnemonics were not significant predictors of change.Measures of cerebral metabolism, objective memory performance, sex, and education may predict subsequent cognitive change in middle-aged and older persons with memory loss. Also, the parietal asymmetry found in persons with questionable dementia that progresses to probable Alzheimer's disease may be present very early in the course of age-related cognitive decline.Decreased cortical glucose metabolism in converters from CDR 0.5 to Alzheimer's disease in a community: the Osaki-Tajiri Project.Several follow-up [18F]fluorodeoxy glucose (FDG)-positron emission tomography (PET) studies have been performed in patients with mild cognitive impairment, but none have examined subjects with a Clinical Dementia Rating (CDR) of 0.5. Therefore, we used FDG-PET to investigate whether baseline glucose metabolism (CMRglc) in CDR 0.5 converters to dementia showed changes consistent with early Alzheimer's disease (AD).Based on our earlier study, which we refer to as Prevalence Study 1998, we were able to examine 14 CDR 0, 42 CDR 0.5, and 12 AD subjects with PET and follow these subjects for five years. Baseline neuropsychological and CMRglc values were compared among groups of CDR 0, CDR 0.5/converters, CDR 0.5/non-converters, and AD subjects.All CDR 0 subjects were reassessed as CDR 0 after the five-year period. For CDR 0.5 subjects, 20 had converted to AD and 22 remained as CDR 0.5. In cognitive tests, CDR 0.5/converters showed significantly deteriorated recent memory function compared with CDR 0.5/non-converters at the baseline evaluation. Most brain areas showed decreased CMRglc in AD patients. CDR 0.5/converters had a significantly lower baseline CMRglc in the right cingulate, left inferior parietal and left temporal gyrus compared with CDR 0.5/non-converters.Our findings suggest that CDR 0.5/converters have a baseline metabolic decline in areas that might be specific to AD.Mapping brain morphological and functional conversion patterns in amnestic MCI: a voxel-based MRI and FDG-PET study.To reveal the morphological and functional substrates of memory impairment and conversion to Alzheimer disease (AD) from the stage of amnestic mild cognitive impairment (aMCI).Brain MRI and FDG-PET were performed in 20 patients with aMCI and 12 controls at baseline. During a mean follow-up of about 2 years, 9 patients developed AD (converters), and 11 did not (nonconverters). All images were processed with SPM2. FDG-PET and segmented grey matter (GM) images were compared in: (1) converters versus controls, (2) nonconverters versus controls, and (3) converters versus nonconverters.As compared to controls, converters showed lower GM density in the left parahippocampal gyrus and both thalami, and hypometabolism in the precuneus, posterior cingulate and superior parietal lobule in the left hemisphere. Hypometabolism was found in nonconverters as compared to controls in the left precuneus and posterior cingulated gyrus. As compared to nonconverters, converters showed significant hypometabolism in the left middle and superior temporal gyri.The discordant topography between atrophy and hypometabolism reported in AD is already present at the aMCI stage. Posterior cingulate-precuneus hypometabolism seemed to be an early sign of memory deficit, whereas hypometabolism in the left temporal cortex marked the conversion to AD.Resting metabolic connectivity in prodromal Alzheimer's disease. A European Alzheimer Disease Consortium (EADC) project.We explored resting-state metabolic connectivity in prodromal Alzheimer's disease (pAD) patients and in healthy controls (CTR), through a voxel-wise interregional correlation analysis of 18F-fluorodeoxyglucose (FDG)-positron emission tomography (PET) by means of statistical parametric mapping. Baseline 18F-fluorodeoxyglucose-positron emission tomography of 36 patients with amnestic mild cognitive impairment who converted to Alzheimer's disease (AD) dementia after an average time of 2 years (pAD) and of 105 CTR were processed. The area of hypometabolism in pAD showed less metabolic connectivity in patients than in CTR (autocorrelation and correlation with large temporal and frontal areas, respectively). pAD patients showed limited correlation even in selected nonhypometabolic areas, including the hippocampi and the dorsolateral prefrontal cortex (DLFC). On the contrary, in CTR group correlation was highlighted between hippocampi and precuneus/posterior cingulate and frontal cortex, and between dorsolateral prefrontal cortex and caudate nuclei and parietal cortex. The reduced metabolic connections both in hypometabolic and nonhypometabolic areas in pAD patients suggest that metabolic disconnection (reflecting early diaschisis) may antedate remote hypometabolism (early sign of synaptic degeneration).Longitudinal change of biomarkers in cognitive decline.To delineate the trajectories of Aβ42 level in cerebrospinal fluid (CSF), fludeoxyglucose F18 (FDG) uptake using positron emission tomography, and hippocampal volume using magnetic resonance imaging and their relative associations with cognitive change at different stages in aging and Alzheimer disease (AD).Cohort study.The 59 study sites for the Alzheimer's Disease Neuroimaging Initiative.A total of 819 participants 55 to 90 years of age with normal cognition, mild cognitive impairment, and AD who were followed up during the period from 2005 to 2007.Rates of change in level of Aβ42 in CSF, FDG uptake, hippocampal volume, and the Alzheimer Disease's Assessment Scale-cognitive subscale score during up to 36 months of follow-up by diagnostic group as well as prediction of cognitive change by each biomarker.Reductions in the level of Aβ42 in CSF were numerically greater in participants with normal cognition than in participants with mild cognitive impairment or AD; whereas both glucose metabolic decline and hippocampal atrophy were significantly slower in participants with normal cognition than in participants with mild cognitive impairment or AD. Positive APOE4 status accelerated hippocampal atrophic changes in participants with mild cognitive impairment or AD, but did not modify rates of change in level of Aβ42 in CSF or FDG uptake. The Alzheimer Disease's Assessment Scale-cognitive subscale scores were related only to the baseline level of Aβ42 in CSF and the baseline FDG uptake in participants with normal cognition, which were about equally associated with change in FDG uptake and hippocampal volume in participants with mild cognitive impairment and best modeled by change in FDG uptake in participants with AD.Trajectories of Aβ42 level in CSF, FDG uptake, and hippocampal volume vary across different cognitive stages. The longitudinal patterns support a hypothetical sequence of AD pathology in which amyloid deposition is an early event before hypometabolism or hippocampal atrophy, suggesting that biomarker prediction for cognitive change is stage dependent.Amyloid deposition, hypometabolism, and longitudinal cognitive decline.Using data from the Alzheimer's Disease Neuroimaging Initiative (ADNI) population, we examined (1) cross-sectional relationships between amyloid deposition, hypometabolism, and cognition, and (2) associations between amyloid and hypometabolism measurements and longitudinal cognitive measurements.We examined associations between mean cortical florbetapir uptake, mean (18) F-fluorodeoxyglucose-positron emission tomography (FDG-PET) within a set of predefined regions, and Alzhiemer's Disease Assessment Scale (ADAS-cog) performance in 426 ADNI participants (126 normal, 162 early mild cognitive impairment [EMCI], 85 late MCI [LMCI], 53 Alzheimer disease [AD] patients). For a subset of these (76 normal, 81 LMCI) we determined whether florbetapir and FDG-PET were associated with retrospective decline in longitudinal ADAS-cog measurements.Twenty-nine percent of normal subjects, 43% of EMCI patients, 62% of LMCI patients, and 77% of AD patients were categorized as florbetapir positive. Florbetapir was negatively associated with concurrent FDG and ADAS-cog in both MCI groups. In longitudinal analyses, florbetapir-positive subjects in both normal and LMCI groups had greater ongoing ADAS-cog decline than those who were florbetapir negative. However, in normal subjects, florbetapir positivity was associated with greater ADAS-cog decline than FDG, whereas in LMCI, FDG positivity was associated with greater decline than florbetapir.Although both hypometabolism and β-amyloid (Aβ) deposition are detectable in normal subjects and all diagnostic groups, Aβ showed greater associations with cognitive decline in normal participants. In view of the minimal cognitive deterioration overall in this group, this suggests that amyloid deposition has an early and subclinical impact on cognition that precedes metabolic changes. At moderate and later stages of disease (LMCI/AD), hypometabolism becomes more pronounced and more closely linked to ongoing cognitive decline.MCI patients declining and not-declining at mid-term follow-up: FDG-PET findings.Patients with Mild Cognitive Impairment (MCI) not converted to dementia at one to three years follow-up represent a heterogeneous group across studies, by including 'late converters' but also patients without any neurodegenerative disease. We tested the hypothesis that the combination of memory and brain metabolic assessment could identify subgroups of memory decliners (MCI/Decl) and non-decliners (MCI/noDecl) before a long follow-up time is available. From twenty-nine patients with amnestic MCI (aMCI) at baseline, three groups were identified at follow-up: 10 patients who converted to AD (MCI/AD); 10 patients either showing episodic memory worsening or reaching the floor effect on memory and declining in other key tests (MCI/Decl) and 9 patients showing no memory worsening or even improvement (MCI/noDecl). They were compared with a group of fourteen elderly controls (CTR) by means of basal FDG-PET voxel-based analysis (SPM2). Two hypometabolic clusters were found in MCI/AD versus CTR, including the bilateral posterior cingulate cortex, the left parietal precuneus and the left fusiform gyrus. MCI/AD showed also a large hypometabolic region, mainly including the left medium and superior temporal gyri and inferior parietal lobule, when compared to MCI/noDecl. The MCI/Decl showed a hypometabolic region in the left medial temporal lobe versus both CTR (hippocampus) and MCI/noDecl (parahippocampal gyrus and hippocampus). No significant difference was found in the comparison between CTR and MCI/noDecl, neither in the comparison between MCI/Decl and MCI/AD. Thus, non converter MCI patients comprised a sub-group of 'decliners' with AD-like metabolic and cognitive patterns, likely including 'late converters', and a sub-group lacking this pattern, with stable or improving memory function and a brain metabolic picture similar to that in healthy controls. Combining neuropsychological and FDG-PET information could be used for prognostic purposes in aMCI patients at medium-term follow-up.Cerebral metabolic changes accompanying conversion of mild cognitive impairment into Alzheimer's disease: a PET follow-up study.A high percentage of patients with mild cognitive impairment (MCI) develop clinical dementia of the Alzheimer type (AD) within 1 year. The aim of this longitudinal study was to identify characteristic patterns of cerebral metabolism at baseline in patients converting from MCI to AD, and to evaluate the changes in these patterns over time. Baseline and follow-up examinations after 1 year were performed in 22 MCI patients (12 males, 10 females, aged 69.8+/-5.8 years); these examinations included neuropsychological testing, structural cranial magnetic resonance imaging and fluorine-18 fluorodeoxyglucose positron emission tomography (PET) evaluation of relative cerebral glucose metabolic rate (rCMRglc). Individual PET scans were stereotactically normalised with NEUROSTAT software (Univ. of Michigan, Ann Arbor, USA). Subsequently, statistical comparison of PET data with an age-matched healthy control population and between patient subgroups was performed using SPM 99 (Wellcome Dept. of Neuroimaging Sciences, London, UK). After 1 year, eight patients (36%) had developed probable AD (referred to as MCI(AD)), whereas 12 (55%) were still classified as having stable MCI (referred to as MCI(MCI)). Compared with the healthy control group, a reduced rCMRglc in AD-typical regions, including the temporoparietal and posterior cingulate cortex, was detected at baseline in patients with MCI(AD). Abnormalities in the posterior cingulate cortex reached significance even in comparison with the MCI(MCI) group. After 1 year, MCI(AD) patients demonstrated an additional bilateral reduction of rCMRglc in prefrontal areas, along with a further progression of the abnormalities in the parietal and posterior cingulate cortex. No such changes were observed in the MCI(MCI) group. In patients with MCI, characteristic cerebral metabolic differences can be delineated at the time of initial presentation, which helps to define prognostic subgroups. A newly emerging reduction of rCMRglc in prefrontal cortical areas is associated with the transition from MCI to AD.Vascular burden and Alzheimer disease pathologic progression.To investigate the vascular contribution to longitudinal changes in Alzheimer disease (AD) biomarkers.The Alzheimer's Disease Neuroimaging Initiative is a clinic based, longitudinal study with CSF, PET, and MRI biomarkers repeatedly measured in participants with normal cognition (NC), mild cognitive impairment (MCI), and mild AD. Participants with severe cerebrovascular risks were excluded. Cardiovascular risk scores and MRI white matter hyperintensities (WMHs) were treated as surrogate markers for vascular burden. Generalized estimating equations were applied, and both vascular burden and its interaction with time (vascular burden × time) or time-varying WMHs were entered into regression models to assess whether biomarker rates of change were modified by vascular burden.Cardiovascular risk profiles were not predictive of progression in CSF β₄₂-amyloid, [¹⁸F]fluorodeoxyglucose (FDG) PET uptake, and MRI hippocampal atrophy. Greater baseline cardiovascular risks or WMHs were generally associated with cognitive impairment, particularly poor executive function. WMHs increased over time with a faster rate in MCI and AD than in NC. Increased time-varying WMH was associated with faster decline in executive function and lower FDG uptake in NC. Otherwise, WMH was not associated with CSF and MRI biomarkers in the 3 groups. These findings remained unchanged after accounting for APOE4.Increased WMHs are associated with aging, decreased glucose metabolism, and decline in executive function but do not affect AD-specific pathologic progression, suggesting that the vascular contribution to dementia is probably additive although not necessarily independent of the amyloid pathway.Reduced cerebral glucose metabolism in patients at risk for Alzheimer's disease.While significantly reduced glucose metabolism in fronto-temporo-parietal and cingulate cortices has been demonstrated in Alzheimer's disease (AD) compared with controls, cerebral glucose metabolism in patients with mild cognitive impairment who subsequently develop AD is less well-defined. In the present study we measured cerebral glucose metabolism by positron emission tomography (PET) with (18)F-2-fluoro-2-deoxy-D-glucose in 14 patients with aging-associated cognitive decline (AACD), 44 patients with AD, and 14 healthy control subjects at baseline. The AACD patients were clinically followed up, and conversion to AD was determined. Compared with controls, AACD patients had significantly reduced glucose metabolism in the right precuneus, posterior cingulate, right angular gyrus, and bilateral middle temporal cortices, while the respective deficits were more pronounced in AD patients and also involved the frontal cortices. AACD patients who subsequently converted to AD (AACD-converters) showed more extended metabolic changes which also involved the frontal and temporal cortices, right cingulate gyrus, right thalamus, and bilateral precuneus.Education and occupation as proxies for reserve in aMCI converters and AD: FDG-PET evidence.Previous reports have shown that higher education is associated with more severe brain pathology in patients with Alzheimer disease (AD), suggesting that these individuals have a functional reserve provided by education, which masks the clinical expression of a higher degree of neurodegeneration. It is unknown if a similar reserve mechanism exists in patients with amnestic mild cognitive impairment (aMCI). The aim of this study was to assess the impact of education and occupation on brain glucose metabolism (rCMRglc) measured with FDG-PET in aMCI and in a very large sample of subjects with probable AD (pAD).A total of 242 patients with pAD, 72 with aMCI, and 144 healthy controls participated in the study. At follow-up, 21 subjects with aMCI progressed to AD. A regression analysis was conducted (SPM2), with education and occupation as independent variables, and rCMRglc as dependent variable, adjusting for demographic data, global cognitive status, and neuropsychological scores.The analysis showed a significant association between higher education/occupation and lower rCMRglc in posterior temporoparietal cortex and precuneus in pAD and aMCI converters, and no correlation in aMCI nonconverters and healthy controls. This means that, when submitted to FDG-PET for diagnostic evaluation, pAD and aMCI converters with higher education/occupation had, for comparable cognitive impairment, a more severe rCMRglc reduction than the ones with lower education/occupation.This study suggests that education and occupation may be proxies for brain functional reserve, reducing the severity and delaying the clinical expression of Alzheimer disease (AD) pathology. The results in aMCI converters suggest that functional reserve is already at play in the predementia phase of AD.Predicting future clinical changes of MCI patients using longitudinal and multimodal biomarkers.Accurate prediction of clinical changes of mild cognitive impairment (MCI) patients, including both qualitative change (i.e., conversion to Alzheimer's disease (AD)) and quantitative change (i.e., cognitive scores) at future time points, is important for early diagnosis of AD and for monitoring the disease progression. In this paper, we propose to predict future clinical changes of MCI patients by using both baseline and longitudinal multimodality data. To do this, we first develop a longitudinal feature selection method to jointly select brain regions across multiple time points for each modality. Specifically, for each time point, we train a sparse linear regression model by using the imaging data and the corresponding clinical scores, with an extra 'group regularization' to group the weights corresponding to the same brain region across multiple time points together and to allow for selection of brain regions based on the strength of multiple time points jointly. Then, to further reflect the longitudinal changes on the selected brain regions, we extract a set of longitudinal features from the original baseline and longitudinal data. Finally, we combine all features on the selected brain regions, from different modalities, for prediction by using our previously proposed multi-kernel SVM. We validate our method on 88 ADNI MCI subjects, with both MRI and FDG-PET data and the corresponding clinical scores (i.e., MMSE and ADAS-Cog) at 5 different time points. We first predict the clinical scores (MMSE and ADAS-Cog) at 24-month by using the multimodality data at previous time points, and then predict the conversion of MCI to AD by using the multimodality data at time points which are at least 6-month ahead of the conversion. The results on both sets of experiments show that our proposed method can achieve better performance in predicting future clinical changes of MCI patients than the conventional methods.Amyloid deposition, hypometabolism, and longitudinal cognitive decline.Using data from the Alzheimer's Disease Neuroimaging Initiative (ADNI) population, we examined (1) cross-sectional relationships between amyloid deposition, hypometabolism, and cognition, and (2) associations between amyloid and hypometabolism measurements and longitudinal cognitive measurements.We examined associations between mean cortical florbetapir uptake, mean (18) F-fluorodeoxyglucose-positron emission tomography (FDG-PET) within a set of predefined regions, and Alzhiemer's Disease Assessment Scale (ADAS-cog) performance in 426 ADNI participants (126 normal, 162 early mild cognitive impairment [EMCI], 85 late MCI [LMCI], 53 Alzheimer disease [AD] patients). For a subset of these (76 normal, 81 LMCI) we determined whether florbetapir and FDG-PET were associated with retrospective decline in longitudinal ADAS-cog measurements.Twenty-nine percent of normal subjects, 43% of EMCI patients, 62% of LMCI patients, and 77% of AD patients were categorized as florbetapir positive. Florbetapir was negatively associated with concurrent FDG and ADAS-cog in both MCI groups. In longitudinal analyses, florbetapir-positive subjects in both normal and LMCI groups had greater ongoing ADAS-cog decline than those who were florbetapir negative. However, in normal subjects, florbetapir positivity was associated with greater ADAS-cog decline than FDG, whereas in LMCI, FDG positivity was associated with greater decline than florbetapir.Although both hypometabolism and β-amyloid (Aβ) deposition are detectable in normal subjects and all diagnostic groups, Aβ showed greater associations with cognitive decline in normal participants. In view of the minimal cognitive deterioration overall in this group, this suggests that amyloid deposition has an early and subclinical impact on cognition that precedes metabolic changes. At moderate and later stages of disease (LMCI/AD), hypometabolism becomes more pronounced and more closely linked to ongoing cognitive decline.Vascular burden and Alzheimer disease pathologic progression.To investigate the vascular contribution to longitudinal changes in Alzheimer disease (AD) biomarkers.The Alzheimer's Disease Neuroimaging Initiative is a clinic based, longitudinal study with CSF, PET, and MRI biomarkers repeatedly measured in participants with normal cognition (NC), mild cognitive impairment (MCI), and mild AD. Participants with severe cerebrovascular risks were excluded. Cardiovascular risk scores and MRI white matter hyperintensities (WMHs) were treated as surrogate markers for vascular burden. Generalized estimating equations were applied, and both vascular burden and its interaction with time (vascular burden × time) or time-varying WMHs were entered into regression models to assess whether biomarker rates of change were modified by vascular burden.Cardiovascular risk profiles were not predictive of progression in CSF β₄₂-amyloid, [¹⁸F]fluorodeoxyglucose (FDG) PET uptake, and MRI hippocampal atrophy. Greater baseline cardiovascular risks or WMHs were generally associated with cognitive impairment, particularly poor executive function. WMHs increased over time with a faster rate in MCI and AD than in NC. Increased time-varying WMH was associated with faster decline in executive function and lower FDG uptake in NC. Otherwise, WMH was not associated with CSF and MRI biomarkers in the 3 groups. These findings remained unchanged after accounting for APOE4.Increased WMHs are associated with aging, decreased glucose metabolism, and decline in executive function but do not affect AD-specific pathologic progression, suggesting that the vascular contribution to dementia is probably additive although not necessarily independent of the amyloid pathway.Predicting future clinical changes of MCI patients using longitudinal and multimodal biomarkers.Accurate prediction of clinical changes of mild cognitive impairment (MCI) patients, including both qualitative change (i.e., conversion to Alzheimer's disease (AD)) and quantitative change (i.e., cognitive scores) at future time points, is important for early diagnosis of AD and for monitoring the disease progression. In this paper, we propose to predict future clinical changes of MCI patients by using both baseline and longitudinal multimodality data. To do this, we first develop a longitudinal feature selection method to jointly select brain regions across multiple time points for each modality. Specifically, for each time point, we train a sparse linear regression model by using the imaging data and the corresponding clinical scores, with an extra 'group regularization' to group the weights corresponding to the same brain region across multiple time points together and to allow for selection of brain regions based on the strength of multiple time points jointly. Then, to further reflect the longitudinal changes on the selected brain regions, we extract a set of longitudinal features from the original baseline and longitudinal data. Finally, we combine all features on the selected brain regions, from different modalities, for prediction by using our previously proposed multi-kernel SVM. We validate our method on 88 ADNI MCI subjects, with both MRI and FDG-PET data and the corresponding clinical scores (i.e., MMSE and ADAS-Cog) at 5 different time points. We first predict the clinical scores (MMSE and ADAS-Cog) at 24-month by using the multimodality data at previous time points, and then predict the conversion of MCI to AD by using the multimodality data at time points which are at least 6-month ahead of the conversion. The results on both sets of experiments show that our proposed method can achieve better performance in predicting future clinical changes of MCI patients than the conventional methods.Longitudinal imaging of Alzheimer pathology using [11C]PIB, [18F]FDDNP and [18F]FDG PET.[(11)C]PIB and [(18)F]FDDNP are PET tracers for in vivo detection of the neuropathology underlying Alzheimer's disease (AD). [(18)F]FDG is a glucose analogue and its uptake reflects metabolic activity. The purpose of this study was to examine longitudinal changes in these tracers in patients with AD or mild cognitive impairment (MCI) and in healthy controls.Longitudinal, paired, dynamic [(11)C]PIB and [(18)F]FDDNP (90 min each) and static [(18)F]FDG (15 min) PET scans were obtained in 11 controls, 12 MCI patients and 8 AD patients. The mean interval between baseline and follow-up was 2.5 years (range 2.0-4.0 years). Parametric [(11)C]PIB and [(18)F]FDDNP images of binding potential (BP(ND)) and [(18)F]FDG standardized uptake value ratio (SUVr) images were generated.A significant increase in global cortical [(11)C]PIB BP(ND) was found in MCI patients, but no changes were observed in AD patients or controls. Subsequent regional analysis revealed that this increase in [(11)C]PIB BP(ND) in MCI patients was most prominent in the lateral temporal lobe (p < 0.05). For [(18)F]FDDNP, no changes in global BP(ND) were found. [(18)F]FDG uptake was reduced at follow-up in the AD group only, especially in frontal, parietal and lateral temporal lobes (all p < 0.01). Changes in global [(11)C]PIB binding (ρ = -0.42, p < 0.05) and posterior cingulate [(18)F]FDG uptake (ρ = 0.54, p < 0.01) were correlated with changes in Mini-Mental-State Examination score over time across groups, whilst changes in [(18)F]FDDNP binding (ρ = -0.18, p = 0.35) were not.[(11)C]PIB and [(18)F]FDG track molecular changes in different stages of AD. We found increased amyloid load in MCI patients and progressive metabolic impairment in AD patients. [(18)F]FDDNP seems to be less useful for examining disease progression.Resting metabolic connectivity in prodromal Alzheimer's disease. A European Alzheimer Disease Consortium (EADC) project.We explored resting-state metabolic connectivity in prodromal Alzheimer's disease (pAD) patients and in healthy controls (CTR), through a voxel-wise interregional correlation analysis of 18F-fluorodeoxyglucose (FDG)-positron emission tomography (PET) by means of statistical parametric mapping. Baseline 18F-fluorodeoxyglucose-positron emission tomography of 36 patients with amnestic mild cognitive impairment who converted to Alzheimer's disease (AD) dementia after an average time of 2 years (pAD) and of 105 CTR were processed. The area of hypometabolism in pAD showed less metabolic connectivity in patients than in CTR (autocorrelation and correlation with large temporal and frontal areas, respectively). pAD patients showed limited correlation even in selected nonhypometabolic areas, including the hippocampi and the dorsolateral prefrontal cortex (DLFC). On the contrary, in CTR group correlation was highlighted between hippocampi and precuneus/posterior cingulate and frontal cortex, and between dorsolateral prefrontal cortex and caudate nuclei and parietal cortex. The reduced metabolic connections both in hypometabolic and nonhypometabolic areas in pAD patients suggest that metabolic disconnection (reflecting early diaschisis) may antedate remote hypometabolism (early sign of synaptic degeneration).Value of diagnostic tests to predict conversion to Alzheimer's disease in young and old patients with amnestic mild cognitive impairment.Using the database of the Alzheimer's Disease Neuroimaging Initiative, we examined the value of neuropsychological assessment, structural magnetic resonance imaging (MRI), cerebrospinal fluid (CSF) biomarkers, and FDG-PET scanning with respect to prediction of conversion from mild cognitive impairment (MCI) to Alzheimer's disease (AD). We tested the hypothesis that CSF biomarkers and FDG-PET would lose prognostic value when applied in patients older than 75 years, whereas MRI and neuropsychological testing would not. At baseline 175 patients had MCI, mostly amnestic. They were followed during a mean of 2.7 years, and 81 patients converted to AD after a mean of 1.6 years. Logistic regression analyses showed that neuropsychological assessment and MRI variables predicted conversion with 63 to 67% classification success both in patients younger and older than 75 years, while CSF biomarkers attained this success rate only in patients younger than 75 years. For FDG-PET, this rate was 57% in the total sample. We conclude that the diagnostic yield of different techniques in predicting conversion from MCI to AD is moderate, and that it is affected by age of the subject under study. MRI and neuropsychological assessment remain informative in patients older than 75 years, unlike CSF biomarkers.Evaluation of a calibrated (18)F-FDG PET score as a biomarker for progression in Alzheimer disease and mild cognitive impairment.Increasingly, clinical trials are being planned in patients with mild cognitive impairment (MCI) to prevent or delay the onset of dementia in Alzheimer disease (AD) by disease-modifying intervention. Inclusion of imaging techniques as biomarkers for patient selection and assessment of outcome is expected to increase trial efficacy. PET using (18)F-FDG provides objective information about the impairment of synaptic function and could, with appropriate standardization, qualify as a biomarker.We evaluated a predefined quantitative measure (PET score) that is extracted automatically from (18)F-FDG PET scans using a sample of controls (n = 44), patients with MCI (n = 94), and patients with mild AD (n = 40) from the Alzheimer Disease Neuroimaging Initiative (ADNI). Subjects received 4 scans and clinical assessments over 2 y.PET scores provide much higher test-retest reliability than standard neuropsychologic test scores (Alzheimer's Disease Assessment Scale-Cognitive [ADAS-cog] and Mini-Mental State Examination) and superior signal strength for measuring progression. At the same time, they are related linearly to ADAS-cog scores, thus providing a valid measure of cognitive impairment. In addition, PET scores at study entry in MCI patients significantly predict clinical progression to dementia with a higher accuracy than Mini-Mental State Examination and ADAS-cog.(18)F-FDG PET scores are a valid imaging biomarker to monitor the progression of MCI to AD. Their superior test-retest reliability and signal strength will allow the reduction in the number of subjects needed or shortening of study duration substantially.Longitudinal change of biomarkers in cognitive decline.To delineate the trajectories of Aβ42 level in cerebrospinal fluid (CSF), fludeoxyglucose F18 (FDG) uptake using positron emission tomography, and hippocampal volume using magnetic resonance imaging and their relative associations with cognitive change at different stages in aging and Alzheimer disease (AD).Cohort study.The 59 study sites for the Alzheimer's Disease Neuroimaging Initiative.A total of 819 participants 55 to 90 years of age with normal cognition, mild cognitive impairment, and AD who were followed up during the period from 2005 to 2007.Rates of change in level of Aβ42 in CSF, FDG uptake, hippocampal volume, and the Alzheimer Disease's Assessment Scale-cognitive subscale score during up to 36 months of follow-up by diagnostic group as well as prediction of cognitive change by each biomarker.Reductions in the level of Aβ42 in CSF were numerically greater in participants with normal cognition than in participants with mild cognitive impairment or AD; whereas both glucose metabolic decline and hippocampal atrophy were significantly slower in participants with normal cognition than in participants with mild cognitive impairment or AD. Positive APOE4 status accelerated hippocampal atrophic changes in participants with mild cognitive impairment or AD, but did not modify rates of change in level of Aβ42 in CSF or FDG uptake. The Alzheimer Disease's Assessment Scale-cognitive subscale scores were related only to the baseline level of Aβ42 in CSF and the baseline FDG uptake in participants with normal cognition, which were about equally associated with change in FDG uptake and hippocampal volume in participants with mild cognitive impairment and best modeled by change in FDG uptake in participants with AD.Trajectories of Aβ42 level in CSF, FDG uptake, and hippocampal volume vary across different cognitive stages. The longitudinal patterns support a hypothetical sequence of AD pathology in which amyloid deposition is an early event before hypometabolism or hippocampal atrophy, suggesting that biomarker prediction for cognitive change is stage dependent.Associations between cognitive, functional, and FDG-PET measures of decline in AD and MCI.The Functional Activities Questionnaire (FAQ) and Alzheimer's Disease Assessment Scale-cognitive subscale (ADAS-cog) are frequently used indices of cognitive decline in Alzheimer's disease (AD). The goal of this study was to compare FDG-PET and clinical measurements in a large sample of elderly subjects with memory disturbance. We examined relationships between glucose metabolism in FDG-PET regions of interest (FDG-ROIs), and ADAS-cog and FAQ scores in AD and mild cognitive impairment (MCI) patients enrolled in the Alzheimer's Disease Neuroimaging Initiative (ADNI). Low glucose metabolism at baseline predicted subsequent ADAS-cog and FAQ decline. In addition, longitudinal glucose metabolism decline was associated with concurrent ADAS-cog and FAQ decline. Finally, a power analysis revealed that FDG-ROI values have greater statistical power than ADAS-cog to detect attenuation of cognitive decline in AD and MCI patients. Glucose metabolism is a sensitive measure of change in cognition and functional ability in AD and MCI, and has value in predicting future cognitive decline.The new Alzheimer's criteria in a naturalistic series of patients with mild cognitive impairment.To test the validity of the new diagnostic criteria for Alzheimer's disease (AD) in a naturalistic series of patients with mild cognitive impairment (MCI). Ninety consecutive MCI patients were enrolled in a longitudinal study on the natural history of cognitive impairment. Medial temporal (MT) atrophy on MRI was defined as hippocampal volume below the fifth percentile of the distribution in healthy elders, abnormal CSF was based on Sjogren's cutoffs for Abeta42 and tau, and temporoparietal hypometabolism on 18F-FDG PET based on Herholz's t sum score. Patients were followed clinically to detect conversion to AD (MCI-AD), non-AD dementia (MCI-nAD), or no conversion (MCI-NC). The 24 MCI-AD and 15 MCI-nAD patients had sociodemographic, clinical, and neuropsychological baseline features similar to the 51 MCI-NC patients. All MCI patients with MT atrophy converted to AD, as did all those with abnormal CSF, but only 48 and 35% of those without MT atrophy or abnormal CSF converted (p on logrank test = 0.0007 and 0.001). Prediction of AD conversion was enhanced when positivity to either MT atrophy or abnormal CSF was considered, with only 15% of those MCI patients negative on both converting to AD (p < 0.0005). Markers were not predictive of non-AD dementia conversion. The accuracy of either MT atrophy or abnormal CSF in discriminating MCI-AD from MCI-NC was good (AUC 0.82, 95% CI 0.70-0.95). MT atrophy and abnormal CSF are the single most robust predictors of conversion to AD in MCI patients, and their combination enhances prediction. AD markers are not predictive of conversion to non-AD dementia.Comparing predictors of conversion and decline in mild cognitive impairment.A variety of measurements have been individually linked to decline in mild cognitive impairment (MCI), but the identification of optimal markers for predicting disease progression remains unresolved. The goal of this study was to evaluate the prognostic ability of genetic, CSF, neuroimaging, and cognitive measurements obtained in the same participants.APOE epsilon4 allele frequency, CSF proteins (Abeta(1-42), total tau, hyperphosphorylated tau [p-tau(181p)]), glucose metabolism (FDG-PET), hippocampal volume, and episodic memory performance were evaluated at baseline in patients with amnestic MCI (n = 85), using data from a large multisite study (Alzheimer's Disease Neuroimaging Initiative). Patients were classified as normal or abnormal on each predictor variable based on externally derived cutoffs, and then variables were evaluated as predictors of subsequent conversion to Alzheimer disease (AD) and cognitive decline (Alzheimer's Disease Assessment Scale-Cognitive Subscale) during a variable follow-up period (1.9 +/- 0.4 years).Patients with MCI converted to AD at an annual rate of 17.2%. Subjects with MCI who had abnormal results on both FDG-PET and episodic memory were 11.7 times more likely to convert to AD than subjects who had normal results on both measures (p <or= 0.02). In addition, the CSF ratio p-tau(181p)/Abeta(1-42) (beta = 1.10 +/- 0.53; p = 0.04) and, marginally, FDG-PET predicted cognitive decline.Baseline FDG-PET and episodic memory predict conversion to AD, whereas p-tau(181p)/Abeta(1-42) and, marginally, FDG-PET predict longitudinal cognitive decline. Complementary information provided by these biomarkers may aid in future selection of patients for clinical trials or identification of patients likely to benefit from a therapeutic intervention.MCI patients declining and not-declining at mid-term follow-up: FDG-PET findings.Patients with Mild Cognitive Impairment (MCI) not converted to dementia at one to three years follow-up represent a heterogeneous group across studies, by including 'late converters' but also patients without any neurodegenerative disease. We tested the hypothesis that the combination of memory and brain metabolic assessment could identify subgroups of memory decliners (MCI/Decl) and non-decliners (MCI/noDecl) before a long follow-up time is available. From twenty-nine patients with amnestic MCI (aMCI) at baseline, three groups were identified at follow-up: 10 patients who converted to AD (MCI/AD); 10 patients either showing episodic memory worsening or reaching the floor effect on memory and declining in other key tests (MCI/Decl) and 9 patients showing no memory worsening or even improvement (MCI/noDecl). They were compared with a group of fourteen elderly controls (CTR) by means of basal FDG-PET voxel-based analysis (SPM2). Two hypometabolic clusters were found in MCI/AD versus CTR, including the bilateral posterior cingulate cortex, the left parietal precuneus and the left fusiform gyrus. MCI/AD showed also a large hypometabolic region, mainly including the left medium and superior temporal gyri and inferior parietal lobule, when compared to MCI/noDecl. The MCI/Decl showed a hypometabolic region in the left medial temporal lobe versus both CTR (hippocampus) and MCI/noDecl (parahippocampal gyrus and hippocampus). No significant difference was found in the comparison between CTR and MCI/noDecl, neither in the comparison between MCI/Decl and MCI/AD. Thus, non converter MCI patients comprised a sub-group of 'decliners' with AD-like metabolic and cognitive patterns, likely including 'late converters', and a sub-group lacking this pattern, with stable or improving memory function and a brain metabolic picture similar to that in healthy controls. Combining neuropsychological and FDG-PET information could be used for prognostic purposes in aMCI patients at medium-term follow-up.Mapping brain morphological and functional conversion patterns in amnestic MCI: a voxel-based MRI and FDG-PET study.To reveal the morphological and functional substrates of memory impairment and conversion to Alzheimer disease (AD) from the stage of amnestic mild cognitive impairment (aMCI).Brain MRI and FDG-PET were performed in 20 patients with aMCI and 12 controls at baseline. During a mean follow-up of about 2 years, 9 patients developed AD (converters), and 11 did not (nonconverters). All images were processed with SPM2. FDG-PET and segmented grey matter (GM) images were compared in: (1) converters versus controls, (2) nonconverters versus controls, and (3) converters versus nonconverters.As compared to controls, converters showed lower GM density in the left parahippocampal gyrus and both thalami, and hypometabolism in the precuneus, posterior cingulate and superior parietal lobule in the left hemisphere. Hypometabolism was found in nonconverters as compared to controls in the left precuneus and posterior cingulated gyrus. As compared to nonconverters, converters showed significant hypometabolism in the left middle and superior temporal gyri.The discordant topography between atrophy and hypometabolism reported in AD is already present at the aMCI stage. Posterior cingulate-precuneus hypometabolism seemed to be an early sign of memory deficit, whereas hypometabolism in the left temporal cortex marked the conversion to AD.Differences in hippocampal metabolism between amnestic and non-amnestic MCI subjects: automated FDG-PET image analysis.The aim of this study was to assess whether 18F-fluorodeoxyglucose positron emission tomography differentiates amnestic (aMCI) from single-non-amnestic mild cognitive impairment (snaMCI) with executive dysfunction.Sixteen aMCI subjects (62% females, age 75+/-8 years) and 14 snaMCI subjects (71% females, age 74+/-6 years) underwent [18F]FDG-PET and clinical follow-up. Comparisons between MCI subgroups and with seven cognitively normal elderly subjects were performed using SPM2.At baseline aMCI and snaMCI exhibited a similar pattern of hypometabolism, mostly in the posterior cingulate gyrus, as compared with controls. In the comparison between the MCI subtypes, the aMCI subjects showed reduced metabolism in the medial temporal lobes (MTL) (hippocampus, fusiform gyrus and amygdala). At follow-up 12 aMCI developed Alzheimer's disease (AD), while snaMCI had a heterogeneous course, including five subjects who developed Lewy body dementia.The patterns of altered brain metabolism in aMCI and snaMCI subjects compared to controls are similar and do not provide evidence for making clinical distinctions between them. Comparison between the two MCI subtypes showed MTL hypometabolism in aMCI subjects, possibly reflecting the fact that most had prodromal AD.Decreased cortical glucose metabolism in converters from CDR 0.5 to Alzheimer's disease in a community: the Osaki-Tajiri Project.Several follow-up [18F]fluorodeoxy glucose (FDG)-positron emission tomography (PET) studies have been performed in patients with mild cognitive impairment, but none have examined subjects with a Clinical Dementia Rating (CDR) of 0.5. Therefore, we used FDG-PET to investigate whether baseline glucose metabolism (CMRglc) in CDR 0.5 converters to dementia showed changes consistent with early Alzheimer's disease (AD).Based on our earlier study, which we refer to as Prevalence Study 1998, we were able to examine 14 CDR 0, 42 CDR 0.5, and 12 AD subjects with PET and follow these subjects for five years. Baseline neuropsychological and CMRglc values were compared among groups of CDR 0, CDR 0.5/converters, CDR 0.5/non-converters, and AD subjects.All CDR 0 subjects were reassessed as CDR 0 after the five-year period. For CDR 0.5 subjects, 20 had converted to AD and 22 remained as CDR 0.5. In cognitive tests, CDR 0.5/converters showed significantly deteriorated recent memory function compared with CDR 0.5/non-converters at the baseline evaluation. Most brain areas showed decreased CMRglc in AD patients. CDR 0.5/converters had a significantly lower baseline CMRglc in the right cingulate, left inferior parietal and left temporal gyrus compared with CDR 0.5/non-converters.Our findings suggest that CDR 0.5/converters have a baseline metabolic decline in areas that might be specific to AD.Education and occupation as proxies for reserve in aMCI converters and AD: FDG-PET evidence.Previous reports have shown that higher education is associated with more severe brain pathology in patients with Alzheimer disease (AD), suggesting that these individuals have a functional reserve provided by education, which masks the clinical expression of a higher degree of neurodegeneration. It is unknown if a similar reserve mechanism exists in patients with amnestic mild cognitive impairment (aMCI). The aim of this study was to assess the impact of education and occupation on brain glucose metabolism (rCMRglc) measured with FDG-PET in aMCI and in a very large sample of subjects with probable AD (pAD).A total of 242 patients with pAD, 72 with aMCI, and 144 healthy controls participated in the study. At follow-up, 21 subjects with aMCI progressed to AD. A regression analysis was conducted (SPM2), with education and occupation as independent variables, and rCMRglc as dependent variable, adjusting for demographic data, global cognitive status, and neuropsychological scores.The analysis showed a significant association between higher education/occupation and lower rCMRglc in posterior temporoparietal cortex and precuneus in pAD and aMCI converters, and no correlation in aMCI nonconverters and healthy controls. This means that, when submitted to FDG-PET for diagnostic evaluation, pAD and aMCI converters with higher education/occupation had, for comparable cognitive impairment, a more severe rCMRglc reduction than the ones with lower education/occupation.This study suggests that education and occupation may be proxies for brain functional reserve, reducing the severity and delaying the clinical expression of Alzheimer disease (AD) pathology. The results in aMCI converters suggest that functional reserve is already at play in the predementia phase of AD.Principal component analysis of FDG PET in amnestic MCI.The purpose of the study is to evaluate the combined accuracy of episodic memory performance and (18)F-FDG PET in identifying patients with amnestic mild cognitive impairment (aMCI) converting to Alzheimer's disease (AD), aMCI non-converters, and controls.Thirty-three patients with aMCI and 15 controls (CTR) were followed up for a mean of 21 months. Eleven patients developed AD (MCI/AD) and 22 remained with aMCI (MCI/MCI). (18)F-FDG PET volumetric regions of interest underwent principal component analysis (PCA) that identified 12 principal components (PC), expressed by coarse component scores (CCS). Discriminant analysis was performed using the significant PCs and episodic memory scores.PCA highlighted relative hypometabolism in PC5, including bilateral posterior cingulate and left temporal pole, and in PC7, including the bilateral orbitofrontal cortex, both in MCI/MCI and MCI/AD vs CTR. PC5 itself plus PC12, including the left lateral frontal cortex (LFC: BAs 44, 45, 46, 47), were significantly different between MCI/AD and MCI/MCI. By a three-group discriminant analysis, CTR were more accurately identified by PET-CCS + delayed recall score (100%), MCI/MCI by PET-CCS + either immediate or delayed recall scores (91%), while MCI/AD was identified by PET-CCS alone (82%). PET increased by 25% the correct allocations achieved by memory scores, while memory scores increased by 15% the correct allocations achieved by PET.Combining memory performance and (18)F-FDG PET yielded a higher accuracy than each single tool in identifying CTR and MCI/MCI. The PC containing bilateral posterior cingulate and left temporal pole was the hallmark of MCI/MCI patients, while the PC including the left LFC was the hallmark of conversion to AD.FDG-PET and CSF phospho-tau for prediction of cognitive decline in mild cognitive impairment.Specific patterns of cortical glucose metabolism disturbances and increased CSF phospho-tau (p-tau(181)) concentrations could be demonstrated to predict cognitive decline and shift to dementia in amnestic mild cognitive impairment (MCI). But comparisons of both diagnostic tools have not been undertaken so far. The aim of the study was to compare (18)F-fluoro-2-deoxy-d-glucose positron emission tomography (FDG-PET) findings and CSF phospho-tau (p-tau(181)) measurements in the prediction of cognitive deterioration and conversion to dementia in MCI. During follow-up (mean 19 months) eight of 16 patients (50%) showed progressive cognitive decline, and four patients shifted to dementia. Pathological FDG-PET and elevated p-tau(181) levels both predicted deterioration. While p-tau(181) was highly sensitive for cognitive decline, FDG-PET was superior in predicting conversion to clinical dementia in MCI patients.Reduced cerebral glucose metabolism in patients at risk for Alzheimer's disease.While significantly reduced glucose metabolism in fronto-temporo-parietal and cingulate cortices has been demonstrated in Alzheimer's disease (AD) compared with controls, cerebral glucose metabolism in patients with mild cognitive impairment who subsequently develop AD is less well-defined. In the present study we measured cerebral glucose metabolism by positron emission tomography (PET) with (18)F-2-fluoro-2-deoxy-D-glucose in 14 patients with aging-associated cognitive decline (AACD), 44 patients with AD, and 14 healthy control subjects at baseline. The AACD patients were clinically followed up, and conversion to AD was determined. Compared with controls, AACD patients had significantly reduced glucose metabolism in the right precuneus, posterior cingulate, right angular gyrus, and bilateral middle temporal cortices, while the respective deficits were more pronounced in AD patients and also involved the frontal cortices. AACD patients who subsequently converted to AD (AACD-converters) showed more extended metabolic changes which also involved the frontal and temporal cortices, right cingulate gyrus, right thalamus, and bilateral precuneus.Heterogeneity of brain glucose metabolism in mild cognitive impairment and clinical progression to Alzheimer disease.Subjects with amnesic mild cognitive impairment (aMCI) may include patients at high risk for progression to Alzheimer disease (AD) and a population with different underlying pathologic conditions.To evaluate the potential roles of positron emission tomography with fluorodeoxyglucose F 18 (18FDG-PET) and memory scores in identifying subjects with aMCI and in predicting progression to dementia.Sixty-seven patients at European centers for neurologic and AD care who were diagnosed as having aMCI each underwent an extensive clinical and neuropsychological examination and an 18FDG-PET study. Forty-eight subjects were followed up periodically for at least 1 year, and progression to dementia was evaluated.Brain glucose metabolism and memory scores.Fourteen subjects with aMCI who converted to AD within 1 year showed bilateral hypometabolism in the inferior parietal, posterior cingulate, and medial temporal cortex. Subjects with "stable" aMCI presented with hypometabolism in the dorsolateral frontal cortex. The severity of memory impairment, as evaluated by the California Verbal Learning Test-Long Delay Free Recall scores, correlated with the following brain metabolic patterns: scores less than 7 were associated with a typical 18FDG-PET AD pattern, and scores of 7 or higher were associated with hypometabolism in the dorsolateral frontal cortex and no progression to AD.These data provide evidence for clinical and functional heterogeneity among subjects with aMCI and suggest that 18FDG-PET findings combined with memory scores may be useful in predicting short-term conversion to AD.Prediction of individual clinical outcome in MCI by means of genetic assessment and (18)F-FDG PET.Patients with mild cognitive impairment (MCI) represent a risk population for progressing to dementia of the Alzheimer type (DAT). However, clinical criteria do not ensure reliable individual prognosis in these patients. The objective of this longitudinal, prospective study was to examine the value of (18)F-FDG PET of cerebral glucose metabolism and of genetic susceptibility, as defined by an APOEepsilon4-positive genotype, with regard to the early diagnosis of DAT in patients with MCI.In 30 patients with the diagnosis of MCI (16 female, 14 male; age, 70 +/- 8 y), baseline and follow-up examinations (mean observation period, 16 mo) were performed. In all patients, the APOE genotype was assessed and cerebral glucose metabolism was evaluated at baseline using cranial (18)F-FDG PET. Individual PET data were screened for findings suggestive of Alzheimer's disease (AD), with the help of an automated computer program. After stereotactical normalization of the PET images, this program performs an observer-independent statistical comparison with an age-matched reference database (n = 22).In 43% of all MCI subjects, a PET scan suggestive of AD pathology according to our predefined criteria was observed at baseline (PET+); 57% of all MCI patients were carriers of the APOE epsilon4 allele (e4+). In 40% of all patients, progression of symptoms within the observation period justified the clinical diagnosis of probable DAT at the time of follow-up reevaluation. Statistical evaluation revealed the best results for PET with regard to early diagnosis of DAT in MCI patients (sensitivity, 92%; specificity, 89%). Classification according to the APOE genotype was significantly less successful (sensitivity, 75%; specificity, 56%). However, a combination of both diagnostic tests allowed early diagnosis with either very high specificity (PET+ AND e4+: sensitivity, 67%; specificity, 100%) or very high sensitivity (PET+ OR e4+: sensitivity, 100%; specificity, 44%).(18)F-FDG PET of cerebral glucose metabolism is a valuable diagnostic tool for the prediction of clinical outcome in individual MCI patients. Results are superior to the exclusive assessment of the APOE genotype. A combination of both functional imaging and genotyping may allow an early high-risk or low-risk stratification of patients with either very high sensitivity or very high specificity. This may be valuable, for example, for patient selection in scientific studies.MCI conversion to dementia and the APOE genotype: a prediction study with FDG-PET.To investigate whether the combination of fluoro-2-deoxy-d-glucose (FDG) PET measures with the APOE genotype would improve prediction of the conversion from mild cognitive impairment (MCI) to Alzheimer disease (AD).After 1 year, 8 of 37 patients with MCI converted to AD (22%). Differences in baseline regional glucose metabolic rate (rCMRglc) across groups were assessed on a voxel-based basis using a two-factor analysis of variance with outcome (converters [n = 8] vs nonconverters [n = 29]) and APOE genotype (E4 carriers [E4+] [n = 16] vs noncarriers [E4-] [n = 21]) as grouping factors. Results were considered significant at p < 0.05, corrected for multiple comparisons.All converters showed reduced rCMRglc in the inferior parietal cortex (IPC) as compared with the nonconverters. Hypometabolism in AD-typical regions, that is, temporoparietal and posterior cingulate cortex, was found for the E4+ as compared with the E4- patients, with the E4+/converters (n = 5) having additional rCMRglc reductions within frontal areas, such as the anterior cingulate (ACC) and inferior frontal (IFC) cortex. For the whole MCI sample, IPC rCMRglc predicted conversion to AD with 84% overall diagnostic accuracy (p = 0.003). Moreover, ACC and IFC rCMRglc improved prediction for the E4+ group, yielding 100% sensitivity, 90% specificity, and 94% accuracy (p < 0.0005), thus leading to an excellent discrimination.Fluoro-2-deoxy-d-glucose-PET measures may improve prediction of the conversion to Alzheimer disease, especially in combination with the APOE genotype.Cerebral metabolic changes accompanying conversion of mild cognitive impairment into Alzheimer's disease: a PET follow-up study.A high percentage of patients with mild cognitive impairment (MCI) develop clinical dementia of the Alzheimer type (AD) within 1 year. The aim of this longitudinal study was to identify characteristic patterns of cerebral metabolism at baseline in patients converting from MCI to AD, and to evaluate the changes in these patterns over time. Baseline and follow-up examinations after 1 year were performed in 22 MCI patients (12 males, 10 females, aged 69.8+/-5.8 years); these examinations included neuropsychological testing, structural cranial magnetic resonance imaging and fluorine-18 fluorodeoxyglucose positron emission tomography (PET) evaluation of relative cerebral glucose metabolic rate (rCMRglc). Individual PET scans were stereotactically normalised with NEUROSTAT software (Univ. of Michigan, Ann Arbor, USA). Subsequently, statistical comparison of PET data with an age-matched healthy control population and between patient subgroups was performed using SPM 99 (Wellcome Dept. of Neuroimaging Sciences, London, UK). After 1 year, eight patients (36%) had developed probable AD (referred to as MCI(AD)), whereas 12 (55%) were still classified as having stable MCI (referred to as MCI(MCI)). Compared with the healthy control group, a reduced rCMRglc in AD-typical regions, including the temporoparietal and posterior cingulate cortex, was detected at baseline in patients with MCI(AD). Abnormalities in the posterior cingulate cortex reached significance even in comparison with the MCI(MCI) group. After 1 year, MCI(AD) patients demonstrated an additional bilateral reduction of rCMRglc in prefrontal areas, along with a further progression of the abnormalities in the parietal and posterior cingulate cortex. No such changes were observed in the MCI(MCI) group. In patients with MCI, characteristic cerebral metabolic differences can be delineated at the time of initial presentation, which helps to define prognostic subgroups. A newly emerging reduction of rCMRglc in prefrontal cortical areas is associated with the transition from MCI to AD.Mild cognitive impairment: Can FDG-PET predict who is to rapidly convert to Alzheimer's disease?Patients with mild cognitive impairment (MCI) were assessed, and a metabolic profile associated with conversion to AD at 18-month follow-up was sought. As compared with nonconverters (n = 10), converters (n = 7) had lower fluorodeoxyglucose uptake in the right temporoparietal cortex (p = 0.02, corrected for cluster size), without individual overlap. Awaiting replication in an independent sample, these findings suggest that among patients with MCI, fluorodeoxyglucose PET may accurately identify rapid converters.Impaired cerebral glucose metabolism and cognitive functioning predict deterioration in mild cognitive impairment.The objective of this study was to assess whether reduced glucose metabolism (rCMRGlu) and cognitive functioning could predict development of Alzheimer's disease (AD) in subjects with mild cognitive impairment (MCI). Twenty MCI patients underwent baseline and follow-up investigations of rCMRGlu, as measured by PET, and cognitive function measured by neuropsychological test assessments. Subjects were clinically followed up with an average interval of 36.5 months. Two groups were obtained after the second clinical assessment. Nine patients were diagnosed as AD and classified as progressive MCI (P-MCI), whereas 11 patients remained clinically stable and were classified as stable MCI (S-MCI). There were no differences in demographic variables or baseline MMSE between the two subgroups. Logistic regression indicated the two variables that most effectively predicted future development of AD were rCMRGlu from the left temporoparietal area and performance on the block design. These combined measures gave an optimal 90% correct classification rate, whereas only rCMRGlu or neuropsychology alone gave 75% and 65% correct classification, respectively. Measures of temporoparietal cerebral metabolism and visuospatial function may aid in predicting the evolution to AD for patients with MCI.Neuropsychological function and cerebral glucose utilization in isolated memory impairment and Alzheimer's disease.We hypothesized that 20 patients with isolated memory impairment (IMI) would demonstrate [18F]-2-fluoro-2-deoxy-D-glucose utilization and a progression of neuropsychological symptoms consistent with Alzheimer's disease (AD). IMI subjects performed similarly to AD in recall and verbal fluency, but comparable to normal subjects in other areas of cognitive functioning. A positron emission tomography (PET) diagnostic index based on parietal Z-scores categorized IMI patients into normal and abnormal metabolic patterns. Ten of the original 20 IMI patients (50%) reflected PET AD abnormalities. Clinical information was available for IMI patients at three-year follow-up. Ten (50%) had converted to AD, three were found to have pseudodementia and the seven remained IMI. Of the 10 IMI patients with an originally normal PET index, three (30%) were diagnosed with AD at three years. Of the 10 with an abnormal index originally, seven (70%) converted to AD. The finding that memory deficit in IMI was as pronounced as that in AD patients is consistent with the notion that memory is an initial symptom of AD. A substantial number of the IMI patients reflected regional hypometabolism similar to AD, suggesting that IMI is likely an early stage in progressive dementia. A large percentage of IMI patients converted clinically to AD within three years of initial study, though we observed impaired memory functioning well before a clinical diagnosis of AD could be made. In addition to potential clinical utility, IMI and PET represent an opportunity to study dementia in relation to brain chemistry at a time when brain pathology is in the process of development.Predictors of cognitive change in middle-aged and older adults with memory loss.Previous longitudinal studies of age-related memory loss have focused on objective neuropsychological measures that predict subsequent cognitive change, yet brain metabolic function, self-perception of memory loss, and other measures may also be sensitive indicators of cognitive change. To determine such baseline predictors of change, the authors made longitudinal assessments of middle-aged and older adults with memory loss.Forty-two persons (mean age = 60 years, range = 43-81) with memory complaints received comprehensive baseline assessments, including subjective neuropsychological measures, objective measures of visual-spatial memory (the Benton Visual Retention Test) and verbal memory (the Buschke-Fuld Selective Reminding Test), and positron emission tomography scans to determine neocortical glucose metabolism. At an average follow-up of 3 years, the objective neuropsychological measures were again used to quantify the degree of cognitive change.Multiple regression analyses indicated that parietal asymmetry, sex of the subject, and baseline visual-spatial memory score were significant predictors of change in visual-spatial memory; level of education and baseline verbal memory score predicted change in verbal memory. Other neocortical asymmetry scores, age, family history of Alzheimer's disease, cerebral atrophy, and self-ratings of use of mnemonics were not significant predictors of change.Measures of cerebral metabolism, objective memory performance, sex, and education may predict subsequent cognitive change in middle-aged and older persons with memory loss. Also, the parietal asymmetry found in persons with questionable dementia that progresses to probable Alzheimer's disease may be present very early in the course of age-related cognitive decline.Amyloid deposition, hypometabolism, and longitudinal cognitive decline.Using data from the Alzheimer's Disease Neuroimaging Initiative (ADNI) population, we examined (1) cross-sectional relationships between amyloid deposition, hypometabolism, and cognition, and (2) associations between amyloid and hypometabolism measurements and longitudinal cognitive measurements.We examined associations between mean cortical florbetapir uptake, mean (18) F-fluorodeoxyglucose-positron emission tomography (FDG-PET) within a set of predefined regions, and Alzhiemer's Disease Assessment Scale (ADAS-cog) performance in 426 ADNI participants (126 normal, 162 early mild cognitive impairment [EMCI], 85 late MCI [LMCI], 53 Alzheimer disease [AD] patients). For a subset of these (76 normal, 81 LMCI) we determined whether florbetapir and FDG-PET were associated with retrospective decline in longitudinal ADAS-cog measurements.Twenty-nine percent of normal subjects, 43% of EMCI patients, 62% of LMCI patients, and 77% of AD patients were categorized as florbetapir positive. Florbetapir was negatively associated with concurrent FDG and ADAS-cog in both MCI groups. In longitudinal analyses, florbetapir-positive subjects in both normal and LMCI groups had greater ongoing ADAS-cog decline than those who were florbetapir negative. However, in normal subjects, florbetapir positivity was associated with greater ADAS-cog decline than FDG, whereas in LMCI, FDG positivity was associated with greater decline than florbetapir.Although both hypometabolism and β-amyloid (Aβ) deposition are detectable in normal subjects and all diagnostic groups, Aβ showed greater associations with cognitive decline in normal participants. In view of the minimal cognitive deterioration overall in this group, this suggests that amyloid deposition has an early and subclinical impact on cognition that precedes metabolic changes. At moderate and later stages of disease (LMCI/AD), hypometabolism becomes more pronounced and more closely linked to ongoing cognitive decline.Vascular burden and Alzheimer disease pathologic progression.To investigate the vascular contribution to longitudinal changes in Alzheimer disease (AD) biomarkers.The Alzheimer's Disease Neuroimaging Initiative is a clinic based, longitudinal study with CSF, PET, and MRI biomarkers repeatedly measured in participants with normal cognition (NC), mild cognitive impairment (MCI), and mild AD. Participants with severe cerebrovascular risks were excluded. Cardiovascular risk scores and MRI white matter hyperintensities (WMHs) were treated as surrogate markers for vascular burden. Generalized estimating equations were applied, and both vascular burden and its interaction with time (vascular burden × time) or time-varying WMHs were entered into regression models to assess whether biomarker rates of change were modified by vascular burden.Cardiovascular risk profiles were not predictive of progression in CSF β₄₂-amyloid, [¹⁸F]fluorodeoxyglucose (FDG) PET uptake, and MRI hippocampal atrophy. Greater baseline cardiovascular risks or WMHs were generally associated with cognitive impairment, particularly poor executive function. WMHs increased over time with a faster rate in MCI and AD than in NC. Increased time-varying WMH was associated with faster decline in executive function and lower FDG uptake in NC. Otherwise, WMH was not associated with CSF and MRI biomarkers in the 3 groups. These findings remained unchanged after accounting for APOE4.Increased WMHs are associated with aging, decreased glucose metabolism, and decline in executive function but do not affect AD-specific pathologic progression, suggesting that the vascular contribution to dementia is probably additive although not necessarily independent of the amyloid pathway.Predicting future clinical changes of MCI patients using longitudinal and multimodal biomarkers.Accurate prediction of clinical changes of mild cognitive impairment (MCI) patients, including both qualitative change (i.e., conversion to Alzheimer's disease (AD)) and quantitative change (i.e., cognitive scores) at future time points, is important for early diagnosis of AD and for monitoring the disease progression. In this paper, we propose to predict future clinical changes of MCI patients by using both baseline and longitudinal multimodality data. To do this, we first develop a longitudinal feature selection method to jointly select brain regions across multiple time points for each modality. Specifically, for each time point, we train a sparse linear regression model by using the imaging data and the corresponding clinical scores, with an extra 'group regularization' to group the weights corresponding to the same brain region across multiple time points together and to allow for selection of brain regions based on the strength of multiple time points jointly. Then, to further reflect the longitudinal changes on the selected brain regions, we extract a set of longitudinal features from the original baseline and longitudinal data. Finally, we combine all features on the selected brain regions, from different modalities, for prediction by using our previously proposed multi-kernel SVM. We validate our method on 88 ADNI MCI subjects, with both MRI and FDG-PET data and the corresponding clinical scores (i.e., MMSE and ADAS-Cog) at 5 different time points. We first predict the clinical scores (MMSE and ADAS-Cog) at 24-month by using the multimodality data at previous time points, and then predict the conversion of MCI to AD by using the multimodality data at time points which are at least 6-month ahead of the conversion. The results on both sets of experiments show that our proposed method can achieve better performance in predicting future clinical changes of MCI patients than the conventional methods.Longitudinal imaging of Alzheimer pathology using [11C]PIB, [18F]FDDNP and [18F]FDG PET.[(11)C]PIB and [(18)F]FDDNP are PET tracers for in vivo detection of the neuropathology underlying Alzheimer's disease (AD). [(18)F]FDG is a glucose analogue and its uptake reflects metabolic activity. The purpose of this study was to examine longitudinal changes in these tracers in patients with AD or mild cognitive impairment (MCI) and in healthy controls.Longitudinal, paired, dynamic [(11)C]PIB and [(18)F]FDDNP (90 min each) and static [(18)F]FDG (15 min) PET scans were obtained in 11 controls, 12 MCI patients and 8 AD patients. The mean interval between baseline and follow-up was 2.5 years (range 2.0-4.0 years). Parametric [(11)C]PIB and [(18)F]FDDNP images of binding potential (BP(ND)) and [(18)F]FDG standardized uptake value ratio (SUVr) images were generated.A significant increase in global cortical [(11)C]PIB BP(ND) was found in MCI patients, but no changes were observed in AD patients or controls. Subsequent regional analysis revealed that this increase in [(11)C]PIB BP(ND) in MCI patients was most prominent in the lateral temporal lobe (p < 0.05). For [(18)F]FDDNP, no changes in global BP(ND) were found. [(18)F]FDG uptake was reduced at follow-up in the AD group only, especially in frontal, parietal and lateral temporal lobes (all p < 0.01). Changes in global [(11)C]PIB binding (ρ = -0.42, p < 0.05) and posterior cingulate [(18)F]FDG uptake (ρ = 0.54, p < 0.01) were correlated with changes in Mini-Mental-State Examination score over time across groups, whilst changes in [(18)F]FDDNP binding (ρ = -0.18, p = 0.35) were not.[(11)C]PIB and [(18)F]FDG track molecular changes in different stages of AD. We found increased amyloid load in MCI patients and progressive metabolic impairment in AD patients. [(18)F]FDDNP seems to be less useful for examining disease progression.Resting metabolic connectivity in prodromal Alzheimer's disease. A European Alzheimer Disease Consortium (EADC) project.We explored resting-state metabolic connectivity in prodromal Alzheimer's disease (pAD) patients and in healthy controls (CTR), through a voxel-wise interregional correlation analysis of 18F-fluorodeoxyglucose (FDG)-positron emission tomography (PET) by means of statistical parametric mapping. Baseline 18F-fluorodeoxyglucose-positron emission tomography of 36 patients with amnestic mild cognitive impairment who converted to Alzheimer's disease (AD) dementia after an average time of 2 years (pAD) and of 105 CTR were processed. The area of hypometabolism in pAD showed less metabolic connectivity in patients than in CTR (autocorrelation and correlation with large temporal and frontal areas, respectively). pAD patients showed limited correlation even in selected nonhypometabolic areas, including the hippocampi and the dorsolateral prefrontal cortex (DLFC). On the contrary, in CTR group correlation was highlighted between hippocampi and precuneus/posterior cingulate and frontal cortex, and between dorsolateral prefrontal cortex and caudate nuclei and parietal cortex. The reduced metabolic connections both in hypometabolic and nonhypometabolic areas in pAD patients suggest that metabolic disconnection (reflecting early diaschisis) may antedate remote hypometabolism (early sign of synaptic degeneration).Value of diagnostic tests to predict conversion to Alzheimer's disease in young and old patients with amnestic mild cognitive impairment.Using the database of the Alzheimer's Disease Neuroimaging Initiative, we examined the value of neuropsychological assessment, structural magnetic resonance imaging (MRI), cerebrospinal fluid (CSF) biomarkers, and FDG-PET scanning with respect to prediction of conversion from mild cognitive impairment (MCI) to Alzheimer's disease (AD). We tested the hypothesis that CSF biomarkers and FDG-PET would lose prognostic value when applied in patients older than 75 years, whereas MRI and neuropsychological testing would not. At baseline 175 patients had MCI, mostly amnestic. They were followed during a mean of 2.7 years, and 81 patients converted to AD after a mean of 1.6 years. Logistic regression analyses showed that neuropsychological assessment and MRI variables predicted conversion with 63 to 67% classification success both in patients younger and older than 75 years, while CSF biomarkers attained this success rate only in patients younger than 75 years. For FDG-PET, this rate was 57% in the total sample. We conclude that the diagnostic yield of different techniques in predicting conversion from MCI to AD is moderate, and that it is affected by age of the subject under study. MRI and neuropsychological assessment remain informative in patients older than 75 years, unlike CSF biomarkers.Evaluation of a calibrated (18)F-FDG PET score as a biomarker for progression in Alzheimer disease and mild cognitive impairment.Increasingly, clinical trials are being planned in patients with mild cognitive impairment (MCI) to prevent or delay the onset of dementia in Alzheimer disease (AD) by disease-modifying intervention. Inclusion of imaging techniques as biomarkers for patient selection and assessment of outcome is expected to increase trial efficacy. PET using (18)F-FDG provides objective information about the impairment of synaptic function and could, with appropriate standardization, qualify as a biomarker.We evaluated a predefined quantitative measure (PET score) that is extracted automatically from (18)F-FDG PET scans using a sample of controls (n = 44), patients with MCI (n = 94), and patients with mild AD (n = 40) from the Alzheimer Disease Neuroimaging Initiative (ADNI). Subjects received 4 scans and clinical assessments over 2 y.PET scores provide much higher test-retest reliability than standard neuropsychologic test scores (Alzheimer's Disease Assessment Scale-Cognitive [ADAS-cog] and Mini-Mental State Examination) and superior signal strength for measuring progression. At the same time, they are related linearly to ADAS-cog scores, thus providing a valid measure of cognitive impairment. In addition, PET scores at study entry in MCI patients significantly predict clinical progression to dementia with a higher accuracy than Mini-Mental State Examination and ADAS-cog.(18)F-FDG PET scores are a valid imaging biomarker to monitor the progression of MCI to AD. Their superior test-retest reliability and signal strength will allow the reduction in the number of subjects needed or shortening of study duration substantially.Longitudinal change of biomarkers in cognitive decline.To delineate the trajectories of Aβ42 level in cerebrospinal fluid (CSF), fludeoxyglucose F18 (FDG) uptake using positron emission tomography, and hippocampal volume using magnetic resonance imaging and their relative associations with cognitive change at different stages in aging and Alzheimer disease (AD).Cohort study.The 59 study sites for the Alzheimer's Disease Neuroimaging Initiative.A total of 819 participants 55 to 90 years of age with normal cognition, mild cognitive impairment, and AD who were followed up during the period from 2005 to 2007.Rates of change in level of Aβ42 in CSF, FDG uptake, hippocampal volume, and the Alzheimer Disease's Assessment Scale-cognitive subscale score during up to 36 months of follow-up by diagnostic group as well as prediction of cognitive change by each biomarker.Reductions in the level of Aβ42 in CSF were numerically greater in participants with normal cognition than in participants with mild cognitive impairment or AD; whereas both glucose metabolic decline and hippocampal atrophy were significantly slower in participants with normal cognition than in participants with mild cognitive impairment or AD. Positive APOE4 status accelerated hippocampal atrophic changes in participants with mild cognitive impairment or AD, but did not modify rates of change in level of Aβ42 in CSF or FDG uptake. The Alzheimer Disease's Assessment Scale-cognitive subscale scores were related only to the baseline level of Aβ42 in CSF and the baseline FDG uptake in participants with normal cognition, which were about equally associated with change in FDG uptake and hippocampal volume in participants with mild cognitive impairment and best modeled by change in FDG uptake in participants with AD.Trajectories of Aβ42 level in CSF, FDG uptake, and hippocampal volume vary across different cognitive stages. The longitudinal patterns support a hypothetical sequence of AD pathology in which amyloid deposition is an early event before hypometabolism or hippocampal atrophy, suggesting that biomarker prediction for cognitive change is stage dependent.Associations between cognitive, functional, and FDG-PET measures of decline in AD and MCI.The Functional Activities Questionnaire (FAQ) and Alzheimer's Disease Assessment Scale-cognitive subscale (ADAS-cog) are frequently used indices of cognitive decline in Alzheimer's disease (AD). The goal of this study was to compare FDG-PET and clinical measurements in a large sample of elderly subjects with memory disturbance. We examined relationships between glucose metabolism in FDG-PET regions of interest (FDG-ROIs), and ADAS-cog and FAQ scores in AD and mild cognitive impairment (MCI) patients enrolled in the Alzheimer's Disease Neuroimaging Initiative (ADNI). Low glucose metabolism at baseline predicted subsequent ADAS-cog and FAQ decline. In addition, longitudinal glucose metabolism decline was associated with concurrent ADAS-cog and FAQ decline. Finally, a power analysis revealed that FDG-ROI values have greater statistical power than ADAS-cog to detect attenuation of cognitive decline in AD and MCI patients. Glucose metabolism is a sensitive measure of change in cognition and functional ability in AD and MCI, and has value in predicting future cognitive decline.The new Alzheimer's criteria in a naturalistic series of patients with mild cognitive impairment.To test the validity of the new diagnostic criteria for Alzheimer's disease (AD) in a naturalistic series of patients with mild cognitive impairment (MCI). Ninety consecutive MCI patients were enrolled in a longitudinal study on the natural history of cognitive impairment. Medial temporal (MT) atrophy on MRI was defined as hippocampal volume below the fifth percentile of the distribution in healthy elders, abnormal CSF was based on Sjogren's cutoffs for Abeta42 and tau, and temporoparietal hypometabolism on 18F-FDG PET based on Herholz's t sum score. Patients were followed clinically to detect conversion to AD (MCI-AD), non-AD dementia (MCI-nAD), or no conversion (MCI-NC). The 24 MCI-AD and 15 MCI-nAD patients had sociodemographic, clinical, and neuropsychological baseline features similar to the 51 MCI-NC patients. All MCI patients with MT atrophy converted to AD, as did all those with abnormal CSF, but only 48 and 35% of those without MT atrophy or abnormal CSF converted (p on logrank test = 0.0007 and 0.001). Prediction of AD conversion was enhanced when positivity to either MT atrophy or abnormal CSF was considered, with only 15% of those MCI patients negative on both converting to AD (p < 0.0005). Markers were not predictive of non-AD dementia conversion. The accuracy of either MT atrophy or abnormal CSF in discriminating MCI-AD from MCI-NC was good (AUC 0.82, 95% CI 0.70-0.95). MT atrophy and abnormal CSF are the single most robust predictors of conversion to AD in MCI patients, and their combination enhances prediction. AD markers are not predictive of conversion to non-AD dementia.Comparing predictors of conversion and decline in mild cognitive impairment.A variety of measurements have been individually linked to decline in mild cognitive impairment (MCI), but the identification of optimal markers for predicting disease progression remains unresolved. The goal of this study was to evaluate the prognostic ability of genetic, CSF, neuroimaging, and cognitive measurements obtained in the same participants.APOE epsilon4 allele frequency, CSF proteins (Abeta(1-42), total tau, hyperphosphorylated tau [p-tau(181p)]), glucose metabolism (FDG-PET), hippocampal volume, and episodic memory performance were evaluated at baseline in patients with amnestic MCI (n = 85), using data from a large multisite study (Alzheimer's Disease Neuroimaging Initiative). Patients were classified as normal or abnormal on each predictor variable based on externally derived cutoffs, and then variables were evaluated as predictors of subsequent conversion to Alzheimer disease (AD) and cognitive decline (Alzheimer's Disease Assessment Scale-Cognitive Subscale) during a variable follow-up period (1.9 +/- 0.4 years).Patients with MCI converted to AD at an annual rate of 17.2%. Subjects with MCI who had abnormal results on both FDG-PET and episodic memory were 11.7 times more likely to convert to AD than subjects who had normal results on both measures (p <or= 0.02). In addition, the CSF ratio p-tau(181p)/Abeta(1-42) (beta = 1.10 +/- 0.53; p = 0.04) and, marginally, FDG-PET predicted cognitive decline.Baseline FDG-PET and episodic memory predict conversion to AD, whereas p-tau(181p)/Abeta(1-42) and, marginally, FDG-PET predict longitudinal cognitive decline. Complementary information provided by these biomarkers may aid in future selection of patients for clinical trials or identification of patients likely to benefit from a therapeutic intervention.MCI patients declining and not-declining at mid-term follow-up: FDG-PET findings.Patients with Mild Cognitive Impairment (MCI) not converted to dementia at one to three years follow-up represent a heterogeneous group across studies, by including 'late converters' but also patients without any neurodegenerative disease. We tested the hypothesis that the combination of memory and brain metabolic assessment could identify subgroups of memory decliners (MCI/Decl) and non-decliners (MCI/noDecl) before a long follow-up time is available. From twenty-nine patients with amnestic MCI (aMCI) at baseline, three groups were identified at follow-up: 10 patients who converted to AD (MCI/AD); 10 patients either showing episodic memory worsening or reaching the floor effect on memory and declining in other key tests (MCI/Decl) and 9 patients showing no memory worsening or even improvement (MCI/noDecl). They were compared with a group of fourteen elderly controls (CTR) by means of basal FDG-PET voxel-based analysis (SPM2). Two hypometabolic clusters were found in MCI/AD versus CTR, including the bilateral posterior cingulate cortex, the left parietal precuneus and the left fusiform gyrus. MCI/AD showed also a large hypometabolic region, mainly including the left medium and superior temporal gyri and inferior parietal lobule, when compared to MCI/noDecl. The MCI/Decl showed a hypometabolic region in the left medial temporal lobe versus both CTR (hippocampus) and MCI/noDecl (parahippocampal gyrus and hippocampus). No significant difference was found in the comparison between CTR and MCI/noDecl, neither in the comparison between MCI/Decl and MCI/AD. Thus, non converter MCI patients comprised a sub-group of 'decliners' with AD-like metabolic and cognitive patterns, likely including 'late converters', and a sub-group lacking this pattern, with stable or improving memory function and a brain metabolic picture similar to that in healthy controls. Combining neuropsychological and FDG-PET information could be used for prognostic purposes in aMCI patients at medium-term follow-up.Mapping brain morphological and functional conversion patterns in amnestic MCI: a voxel-based MRI and FDG-PET study.To reveal the morphological and functional substrates of memory impairment and conversion to Alzheimer disease (AD) from the stage of amnestic mild cognitive impairment (aMCI).Brain MRI and FDG-PET were performed in 20 patients with aMCI and 12 controls at baseline. During a mean follow-up of about 2 years, 9 patients developed AD (converters), and 11 did not (nonconverters). All images were processed with SPM2. FDG-PET and segmented grey matter (GM) images were compared in: (1) converters versus controls, (2) nonconverters versus controls, and (3) converters versus nonconverters.As compared to controls, converters showed lower GM density in the left parahippocampal gyrus and both thalami, and hypometabolism in the precuneus, posterior cingulate and superior parietal lobule in the left hemisphere. Hypometabolism was found in nonconverters as compared to controls in the left precuneus and posterior cingulated gyrus. As compared to nonconverters, converters showed significant hypometabolism in the left middle and superior temporal gyri.The discordant topography between atrophy and hypometabolism reported in AD is already present at the aMCI stage. Posterior cingulate-precuneus hypometabolism seemed to be an early sign of memory deficit, whereas hypometabolism in the left temporal cortex marked the conversion to AD.Differences in hippocampal metabolism between amnestic and non-amnestic MCI subjects: automated FDG-PET image analysis.The aim of this study was to assess whether 18F-fluorodeoxyglucose positron emission tomography differentiates amnestic (aMCI) from single-non-amnestic mild cognitive impairment (snaMCI) with executive dysfunction.Sixteen aMCI subjects (62% females, age 75+/-8 years) and 14 snaMCI subjects (71% females, age 74+/-6 years) underwent [18F]FDG-PET and clinical follow-up. Comparisons between MCI subgroups and with seven cognitively normal elderly subjects were performed using SPM2.At baseline aMCI and snaMCI exhibited a similar pattern of hypometabolism, mostly in the posterior cingulate gyrus, as compared with controls. In the comparison between the MCI subtypes, the aMCI subjects showed reduced metabolism in the medial temporal lobes (MTL) (hippocampus, fusiform gyrus and amygdala). At follow-up 12 aMCI developed Alzheimer's disease (AD), while snaMCI had a heterogeneous course, including five subjects who developed Lewy body dementia.The patterns of altered brain metabolism in aMCI and snaMCI subjects compared to controls are similar and do not provide evidence for making clinical distinctions between them. Comparison between the two MCI subtypes showed MTL hypometabolism in aMCI subjects, possibly reflecting the fact that most had prodromal AD.Decreased cortical glucose metabolism in converters from CDR 0.5 to Alzheimer's disease in a community: the Osaki-Tajiri Project.Several follow-up [18F]fluorodeoxy glucose (FDG)-positron emission tomography (PET) studies have been performed in patients with mild cognitive impairment, but none have examined subjects with a Clinical Dementia Rating (CDR) of 0.5. Therefore, we used FDG-PET to investigate whether baseline glucose metabolism (CMRglc) in CDR 0.5 converters to dementia showed changes consistent with early Alzheimer's disease (AD).Based on our earlier study, which we refer to as Prevalence Study 1998, we were able to examine 14 CDR 0, 42 CDR 0.5, and 12 AD subjects with PET and follow these subjects for five years. Baseline neuropsychological and CMRglc values were compared among groups of CDR 0, CDR 0.5/converters, CDR 0.5/non-converters, and AD subjects.All CDR 0 subjects were reassessed as CDR 0 after the five-year period. For CDR 0.5 subjects, 20 had converted to AD and 22 remained as CDR 0.5. In cognitive tests, CDR 0.5/converters showed significantly deteriorated recent memory function compared with CDR 0.5/non-converters at the baseline evaluation. Most brain areas showed decreased CMRglc in AD patients. CDR 0.5/converters had a significantly lower baseline CMRglc in the right cingulate, left inferior parietal and left temporal gyrus compared with CDR 0.5/non-converters.Our findings suggest that CDR 0.5/converters have a baseline metabolic decline in areas that might be specific to AD.Education and occupation as proxies for reserve in aMCI converters and AD: FDG-PET evidence.Previous reports have shown that higher education is associated with more severe brain pathology in patients with Alzheimer disease (AD), suggesting that these individuals have a functional reserve provided by education, which masks the clinical expression of a higher degree of neurodegeneration. It is unknown if a similar reserve mechanism exists in patients with amnestic mild cognitive impairment (aMCI). The aim of this study was to assess the impact of education and occupation on brain glucose metabolism (rCMRglc) measured with FDG-PET in aMCI and in a very large sample of subjects with probable AD (pAD).A total of 242 patients with pAD, 72 with aMCI, and 144 healthy controls participated in the study. At follow-up, 21 subjects with aMCI progressed to AD. A regression analysis was conducted (SPM2), with education and occupation as independent variables, and rCMRglc as dependent variable, adjusting for demographic data, global cognitive status, and neuropsychological scores.The analysis showed a significant association between higher education/occupation and lower rCMRglc in posterior temporoparietal cortex and precuneus in pAD and aMCI converters, and no correlation in aMCI nonconverters and healthy controls. This means that, when submitted to FDG-PET for diagnostic evaluation, pAD and aMCI converters with higher education/occupation had, for comparable cognitive impairment, a more severe rCMRglc reduction than the ones with lower education/occupation.This study suggests that education and occupation may be proxies for brain functional reserve, reducing the severity and delaying the clinical expression of Alzheimer disease (AD) pathology. The results in aMCI converters suggest that functional reserve is already at play in the predementia phase of AD.Principal component analysis of FDG PET in amnestic MCI.The purpose of the study is to evaluate the combined accuracy of episodic memory performance and (18)F-FDG PET in identifying patients with amnestic mild cognitive impairment (aMCI) converting to Alzheimer's disease (AD), aMCI non-converters, and controls.Thirty-three patients with aMCI and 15 controls (CTR) were followed up for a mean of 21 months. Eleven patients developed AD (MCI/AD) and 22 remained with aMCI (MCI/MCI). (18)F-FDG PET volumetric regions of interest underwent principal component analysis (PCA) that identified 12 principal components (PC), expressed by coarse component scores (CCS). Discriminant analysis was performed using the significant PCs and episodic memory scores.PCA highlighted relative hypometabolism in PC5, including bilateral posterior cingulate and left temporal pole, and in PC7, including the bilateral orbitofrontal cortex, both in MCI/MCI and MCI/AD vs CTR. PC5 itself plus PC12, including the left lateral frontal cortex (LFC: BAs 44, 45, 46, 47), were significantly different between MCI/AD and MCI/MCI. By a three-group discriminant analysis, CTR were more accurately identified by PET-CCS + delayed recall score (100%), MCI/MCI by PET-CCS + either immediate or delayed recall scores (91%), while MCI/AD was identified by PET-CCS alone (82%). PET increased by 25% the correct allocations achieved by memory scores, while memory scores increased by 15% the correct allocations achieved by PET.Combining memory performance and (18)F-FDG PET yielded a higher accuracy than each single tool in identifying CTR and MCI/MCI. The PC containing bilateral posterior cingulate and left temporal pole was the hallmark of MCI/MCI patients, while the PC including the left LFC was the hallmark of conversion to AD.FDG-PET and CSF phospho-tau for prediction of cognitive decline in mild cognitive impairment.Specific patterns of cortical glucose metabolism disturbances and increased CSF phospho-tau (p-tau(181)) concentrations could be demonstrated to predict cognitive decline and shift to dementia in amnestic mild cognitive impairment (MCI). But comparisons of both diagnostic tools have not been undertaken so far. The aim of the study was to compare (18)F-fluoro-2-deoxy-d-glucose positron emission tomography (FDG-PET) findings and CSF phospho-tau (p-tau(181)) measurements in the prediction of cognitive deterioration and conversion to dementia in MCI. During follow-up (mean 19 months) eight of 16 patients (50%) showed progressive cognitive decline, and four patients shifted to dementia. Pathological FDG-PET and elevated p-tau(181) levels both predicted deterioration. While p-tau(181) was highly sensitive for cognitive decline, FDG-PET was superior in predicting conversion to clinical dementia in MCI patients.Reduced cerebral glucose metabolism in patients at risk for Alzheimer's disease.While significantly reduced glucose metabolism in fronto-temporo-parietal and cingulate cortices has been demonstrated in Alzheimer's disease (AD) compared with controls, cerebral glucose metabolism in patients with mild cognitive impairment who subsequently develop AD is less well-defined. In the present study we measured cerebral glucose metabolism by positron emission tomography (PET) with (18)F-2-fluoro-2-deoxy-D-glucose in 14 patients with aging-associated cognitive decline (AACD), 44 patients with AD, and 14 healthy control subjects at baseline. The AACD patients were clinically followed up, and conversion to AD was determined. Compared with controls, AACD patients had significantly reduced glucose metabolism in the right precuneus, posterior cingulate, right angular gyrus, and bilateral middle temporal cortices, while the respective deficits were more pronounced in AD patients and also involved the frontal cortices. AACD patients who subsequently converted to AD (AACD-converters) showed more extended metabolic changes which also involved the frontal and temporal cortices, right cingulate gyrus, right thalamus, and bilateral precuneus.Heterogeneity of brain glucose metabolism in mild cognitive impairment and clinical progression to Alzheimer disease.Subjects with amnesic mild cognitive impairment (aMCI) may include patients at high risk for progression to Alzheimer disease (AD) and a population with different underlying pathologic conditions.To evaluate the potential roles of positron emission tomography with fluorodeoxyglucose F 18 (18FDG-PET) and memory scores in identifying subjects with aMCI and in predicting progression to dementia.Sixty-seven patients at European centers for neurologic and AD care who were diagnosed as having aMCI each underwent an extensive clinical and neuropsychological examination and an 18FDG-PET study. Forty-eight subjects were followed up periodically for at least 1 year, and progression to dementia was evaluated.Brain glucose metabolism and memory scores.Fourteen subjects with aMCI who converted to AD within 1 year showed bilateral hypometabolism in the inferior parietal, posterior cingulate, and medial temporal cortex. Subjects with "stable" aMCI presented with hypometabolism in the dorsolateral frontal cortex. The severity of memory impairment, as evaluated by the California Verbal Learning Test-Long Delay Free Recall scores, correlated with the following brain metabolic patterns: scores less than 7 were associated with a typical 18FDG-PET AD pattern, and scores of 7 or higher were associated with hypometabolism in the dorsolateral frontal cortex and no progression to AD.These data provide evidence for clinical and functional heterogeneity among subjects with aMCI and suggest that 18FDG-PET findings combined with memory scores may be useful in predicting short-term conversion to AD.Prediction of individual clinical outcome in MCI by means of genetic assessment and (18)F-FDG PET.Patients with mild cognitive impairment (MCI) represent a risk population for progressing to dementia of the Alzheimer type (DAT). However, clinical criteria do not ensure reliable individual prognosis in these patients. The objective of this longitudinal, prospective study was to examine the value of (18)F-FDG PET of cerebral glucose metabolism and of genetic susceptibility, as defined by an APOEepsilon4-positive genotype, with regard to the early diagnosis of DAT in patients with MCI.In 30 patients with the diagnosis of MCI (16 female, 14 male; age, 70 +/- 8 y), baseline and follow-up examinations (mean observation period, 16 mo) were performed. In all patients, the APOE genotype was assessed and cerebral glucose metabolism was evaluated at baseline using cranial (18)F-FDG PET. Individual PET data were screened for findings suggestive of Alzheimer's disease (AD), with the help of an automated computer program. After stereotactical normalization of the PET images, this program performs an observer-independent statistical comparison with an age-matched reference database (n = 22).In 43% of all MCI subjects, a PET scan suggestive of AD pathology according to our predefined criteria was observed at baseline (PET+); 57% of all MCI patients were carriers of the APOE epsilon4 allele (e4+). In 40% of all patients, progression of symptoms within the observation period justified the clinical diagnosis of probable DAT at the time of follow-up reevaluation. Statistical evaluation revealed the best results for PET with regard to early diagnosis of DAT in MCI patients (sensitivity, 92%; specificity, 89%). Classification according to the APOE genotype was significantly less successful (sensitivity, 75%; specificity, 56%). However, a combination of both diagnostic tests allowed early diagnosis with either very high specificity (PET+ AND e4+: sensitivity, 67%; specificity, 100%) or very high sensitivity (PET+ OR e4+: sensitivity, 100%; specificity, 44%).(18)F-FDG PET of cerebral glucose metabolism is a valuable diagnostic tool for the prediction of clinical outcome in individual MCI patients. Results are superior to the exclusive assessment of the APOE genotype. A combination of both functional imaging and genotyping may allow an early high-risk or low-risk stratification of patients with either very high sensitivity or very high specificity. This may be valuable, for example, for patient selection in scientific studies.MCI conversion to dementia and the APOE genotype: a prediction study with FDG-PET.To investigate whether the combination of fluoro-2-deoxy-d-glucose (FDG) PET measures with the APOE genotype would improve prediction of the conversion from mild cognitive impairment (MCI) to Alzheimer disease (AD).After 1 year, 8 of 37 patients with MCI converted to AD (22%). Differences in baseline regional glucose metabolic rate (rCMRglc) across groups were assessed on a voxel-based basis using a two-factor analysis of variance with outcome (converters [n = 8] vs nonconverters [n = 29]) and APOE genotype (E4 carriers [E4+] [n = 16] vs noncarriers [E4-] [n = 21]) as grouping factors. Results were considered significant at p < 0.05, corrected for multiple comparisons.All converters showed reduced rCMRglc in the inferior parietal cortex (IPC) as compared with the nonconverters. Hypometabolism in AD-typical regions, that is, temporoparietal and posterior cingulate cortex, was found for the E4+ as compared with the E4- patients, with the E4+/converters (n = 5) having additional rCMRglc reductions within frontal areas, such as the anterior cingulate (ACC) and inferior frontal (IFC) cortex. For the whole MCI sample, IPC rCMRglc predicted conversion to AD with 84% overall diagnostic accuracy (p = 0.003). Moreover, ACC and IFC rCMRglc improved prediction for the E4+ group, yielding 100% sensitivity, 90% specificity, and 94% accuracy (p < 0.0005), thus leading to an excellent discrimination.Fluoro-2-deoxy-d-glucose-PET measures may improve prediction of the conversion to Alzheimer disease, especially in combination with the APOE genotype.Cerebral metabolic changes accompanying conversion of mild cognitive impairment into Alzheimer's disease: a PET follow-up study.A high percentage of patients with mild cognitive impairment (MCI) develop clinical dementia of the Alzheimer type (AD) within 1 year. The aim of this longitudinal study was to identify characteristic patterns of cerebral metabolism at baseline in patients converting from MCI to AD, and to evaluate the changes in these patterns over time. Baseline and follow-up examinations after 1 year were performed in 22 MCI patients (12 males, 10 females, aged 69.8+/-5.8 years); these examinations included neuropsychological testing, structural cranial magnetic resonance imaging and fluorine-18 fluorodeoxyglucose positron emission tomography (PET) evaluation of relative cerebral glucose metabolic rate (rCMRglc). Individual PET scans were stereotactically normalised with NEUROSTAT software (Univ. of Michigan, Ann Arbor, USA). Subsequently, statistical comparison of PET data with an age-matched healthy control population and between patient subgroups was performed using SPM 99 (Wellcome Dept. of Neuroimaging Sciences, London, UK). After 1 year, eight patients (36%) had developed probable AD (referred to as MCI(AD)), whereas 12 (55%) were still classified as having stable MCI (referred to as MCI(MCI)). Compared with the healthy control group, a reduced rCMRglc in AD-typical regions, including the temporoparietal and posterior cingulate cortex, was detected at baseline in patients with MCI(AD). Abnormalities in the posterior cingulate cortex reached significance even in comparison with the MCI(MCI) group. After 1 year, MCI(AD) patients demonstrated an additional bilateral reduction of rCMRglc in prefrontal areas, along with a further progression of the abnormalities in the parietal and posterior cingulate cortex. No such changes were observed in the MCI(MCI) group. In patients with MCI, characteristic cerebral metabolic differences can be delineated at the time of initial presentation, which helps to define prognostic subgroups. A newly emerging reduction of rCMRglc in prefrontal cortical areas is associated with the transition from MCI to AD.Mild cognitive impairment: Can FDG-PET predict who is to rapidly convert to Alzheimer's disease?Patients with mild cognitive impairment (MCI) were assessed, and a metabolic profile associated with conversion to AD at 18-month follow-up was sought. As compared with nonconverters (n = 10), converters (n = 7) had lower fluorodeoxyglucose uptake in the right temporoparietal cortex (p = 0.02, corrected for cluster size), without individual overlap. Awaiting replication in an independent sample, these findings suggest that among patients with MCI, fluorodeoxyglucose PET may accurately identify rapid converters.Impaired cerebral glucose metabolism and cognitive functioning predict deterioration in mild cognitive impairment.The objective of this study was to assess whether reduced glucose metabolism (rCMRGlu) and cognitive functioning could predict development of Alzheimer's disease (AD) in subjects with mild cognitive impairment (MCI). Twenty MCI patients underwent baseline and follow-up investigations of rCMRGlu, as measured by PET, and cognitive function measured by neuropsychological test assessments. Subjects were clinically followed up with an average interval of 36.5 months. Two groups were obtained after the second clinical assessment. Nine patients were diagnosed as AD and classified as progressive MCI (P-MCI), whereas 11 patients remained clinically stable and were classified as stable MCI (S-MCI). There were no differences in demographic variables or baseline MMSE between the two subgroups. Logistic regression indicated the two variables that most effectively predicted future development of AD were rCMRGlu from the left temporoparietal area and performance on the block design. These combined measures gave an optimal 90% correct classification rate, whereas only rCMRGlu or neuropsychology alone gave 75% and 65% correct classification, respectively. Measures of temporoparietal cerebral metabolism and visuospatial function may aid in predicting the evolution to AD for patients with MCI.Neuropsychological function and cerebral glucose utilization in isolated memory impairment and Alzheimer's disease.We hypothesized that 20 patients with isolated memory impairment (IMI) would demonstrate [18F]-2-fluoro-2-deoxy-D-glucose utilization and a progression of neuropsychological symptoms consistent with Alzheimer's disease (AD). IMI subjects performed similarly to AD in recall and verbal fluency, but comparable to normal subjects in other areas of cognitive functioning. A positron emission tomography (PET) diagnostic index based on parietal Z-scores categorized IMI patients into normal and abnormal metabolic patterns. Ten of the original 20 IMI patients (50%) reflected PET AD abnormalities. Clinical information was available for IMI patients at three-year follow-up. Ten (50%) had converted to AD, three were found to have pseudodementia and the seven remained IMI. Of the 10 IMI patients with an originally normal PET index, three (30%) were diagnosed with AD at three years. Of the 10 with an abnormal index originally, seven (70%) converted to AD. The finding that memory deficit in IMI was as pronounced as that in AD patients is consistent with the notion that memory is an initial symptom of AD. A substantial number of the IMI patients reflected regional hypometabolism similar to AD, suggesting that IMI is likely an early stage in progressive dementia. A large percentage of IMI patients converted clinically to AD within three years of initial study, though we observed impaired memory functioning well before a clinical diagnosis of AD could be made. In addition to potential clinical utility, IMI and PET represent an opportunity to study dementia in relation to brain chemistry at a time when brain pathology is in the process of development.Predictors of cognitive change in middle-aged and older adults with memory loss.Previous longitudinal studies of age-related memory loss have focused on objective neuropsychological measures that predict subsequent cognitive change, yet brain metabolic function, self-perception of memory loss, and other measures may also be sensitive indicators of cognitive change. To determine such baseline predictors of change, the authors made longitudinal assessments of middle-aged and older adults with memory loss.Forty-two persons (mean age = 60 years, range = 43-81) with memory complaints received comprehensive baseline assessments, including subjective neuropsychological measures, objective measures of visual-spatial memory (the Benton Visual Retention Test) and verbal memory (the Buschke-Fuld Selective Reminding Test), and positron emission tomography scans to determine neocortical glucose metabolism. At an average follow-up of 3 years, the objective neuropsychological measures were again used to quantify the degree of cognitive change.Multiple regression analyses indicated that parietal asymmetry, sex of the subject, and baseline visual-spatial memory score were significant predictors of change in visual-spatial memory; level of education and baseline verbal memory score predicted change in verbal memory. Other neocortical asymmetry scores, age, family history of Alzheimer's disease, cerebral atrophy, and self-ratings of use of mnemonics were not significant predictors of change.Measures of cerebral metabolism, objective memory performance, sex, and education may predict subsequent cognitive change in middle-aged and older persons with memory loss. Also, the parietal asymmetry found in persons with questionable dementia that progresses to probable Alzheimer's disease may be present very early in the course of age-related cognitive decline.